Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2348
Exercise of power of appointment.

A general residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all of the testator's property, does not exercise a power of appointment held by the testator unless specific reference is made to the power or there is some other indication of intention to include the property subject to the power.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 70, UPC § 2-610.